Washington statutes.
RCW 21.30.020

Transactions involving commodity contract or option—Prohibition—Exceptions.

Except as otherwise provided in RCW 21.30.030 and 21.30.040, no person may sell or purchase or offer to sell or purchase any commodity under any commodity contract or under any commodity option or offer to enter into or enter into as seller or purchaser any commodity contract or any commodity option.

[ 1986 c 14 s 2.]